District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.09

Repealed

Stock — Amount to be paid in before commencing business; calls for residue of subscription; failure to make payments.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1286, ch. 854, § 613
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.09.
1981 Ed., § 29-209.
1973 Ed., § 29-209.